Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5549.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 6. (1) An applicant for a license shall furnish a surety bond or letter of credit to secure its the applicant's obligations under this act to the commissioner. Except as provided in this subsection, the principal amount of a surety bond or letter of credit shall must be at least $500,000.00. If the applicant intends to provide services for money transmission, services as defined in section 2 of the money transmission services act, the applicant shall must file a surety bond that is in a principal amount as determined under section 13(5)(b) 67 of the money transmission services modernization act for a licensee under that act. (2) A surety bond described in subsection (1) shall must be payable to the commissioner for the benefit of the people of the this state of Michigan for the use of, and may be sued on by, the this state. A surety bond or letter of credit shall remain remains for the duration of the licensure period. (3) A surety bond or letter of credit required under subsection (1) shall must be in a form satisfactory to the commissioner and payable upon on demand by the commissioner if he or she the commissioner determines that the licensee is not conducting its the licensee's activities as required by this act and all of the rules promulgated under this act, and has failed to pay all money that becomes due to a any of the following: (a) A person who is an installment buyer under the motor vehicle sales finance act, 1950 (Ex Sess) PA 27, MCL 492.101 to 492.141. , Michigan residents who purchase checks under the sale of checks act, 1960 PA 136, MCL 487.901 to 487.916, Michigan residents (b) A resident of this state who purchase purchases services for money transmission. services as defined in section 2 of the money transmission services act, (c) A loan applicants, applicant, loan servicing customers, customer, and borrowers or borrower under the secondary mortgage loan act, 1981 PA 125, MCL 493.51 to 493.81, or the mortgage brokers, lenders, and servicers licensing act, 1987 PA 173, MCL 445.1651 to 445.1684, and the commissioner. (4) The commissioner shall prioritize and pay claims against a bond or letter of credit filed with the commissioner under this section in a manner that, in the commissioner's discretion, best protects the public interest. (5) Claims described in subsection (4) may only be filed against a licensee's bond or letter of credit by the commissioner on behalf of the bureau and of individuals having claims and who are, as applicable, the licensee's any of the following: (a) A loan applicants, applicant, loan servicing customers, customer, and borrowers or borrower under the any of the following: (i) The secondary mortgage loan act, 1981 PA 125, MCL 493.51 to 493.81. , or the (ii) The mortgage brokers, lenders, and servicers licensing act, 1987 PA 173, MCL 445.1651 to 445.1684. , Michigan residents who purchase checks under the sale of checks act, 1960 PA 136, MCL 487.901 to 487.916, Michigan residents (b) A resident who purchase purchases services for money transmission. services as defined in section 2 of the money transmission services act, or persons (c) A person who are is an installment buyers buyer under the motor vehicle sales finance act, 1950 (Ex Sess) PA 27, MCL 492.101 to 492.141. (6) Claims filed with the commissioner against a bond or letter of credit by a loan applicant, loan servicing customer, or borrower under the secondary mortgage loan act, 1981 PA 125, MCL 493.51 to 493.81, or the mortgage brokers, lenders, and servicers licensing act, 1987 PA 173, MCL 445.1651 to 445.1684, shall must involve, as applicable, only a mortgage loan, mortgage loan application, secondary mortgage loan, or secondary mortgage loan application secured or to be secured by real property used as a dwelling located in this state. The amount of the claim shall must not exceed actual fees paid by the claimant to the licensee in connection with a loan application, overcharges of principal and interest, and excess escrow collections by the licensee. (7) Before payment of any claim filed under this section, unless the commissioner waives, in whole or in part, the right to priority of payment, the commissioner shall must be paid in full for fines and fees due to the bureau and for expenses incurred in investigating the licensee and in distributing the proceeds of the bond or letter of credit. In the event that valid claims exceed the amount of the bond or letter of credit, each claimant except the commissioner is entitled only to a pro rata amount of his or her the claimant's valid claim. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect January 1, 2026. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 5544 (request no. H02309'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.